Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.020

Livestock brands—Director is the recorder—Recording fee.

The director shall be the recorder of livestock brands and such brands shall not be recorded elsewhere in this state. Any person desiring to record a livestock brand shall apply on a form prescribed by the director. The application shall be accompanied by a facsimile of the brand applied for and a one hundred thirty-two dollar recording fee. The director shall, upon his or her satisfaction that the application and brand facsimile meet the requirements of this chapter and its rules, record the brand. The director must establish a staggered brand record renewal schedule and may adopt an annual or biennial renewal schedule if necessary. The application to transfer a brand shall be accompanied by a notarized form that includes a facsimile of the brand, a description, information about the current owners, and a twenty-seven dollar and fifty cent transfer fee. If the application to transfer a brand is for a legacy brand, the application must be accompanied by a one hundred dollar transfer fee. For purposes of this section, "legacy brand" means a brand that has been in continuous use for at least twenty-five years.

[ 2019 c 92 s 2; 2003 c 326 s 4; 1994 c 46 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 135 s 1; 1965 c 66 s 1; 1959 c 54 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.